Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.150

Property may be followed to adjoining county.

If, after an attachment has been placed in the hands of the sheriff, any property of the defendant is moved from the county, the sheriff may pursue and attach the property in an adjoining county within twenty-four hours after removal.

[ 1987 c 442 s 815; 1886 p 42 s 12; RRS s 658. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.120.]